Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Medicare Supplement Insurance

§ 26-38-201.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Applicant” means:

In the case of an individual Medicare supplement policy, the person who seeks to contract for insurance benefits; and

In the case of a group Medicare supplement policy, the proposed certificate holder.

“Certificate” means any certificate delivered or issued for delivery in this state under a group Medicare supplement policy;

“Certificate form” means the form on which the certificate is delivered or issued for delivery by the issuer;

“Issuer” includes insurance companies, fraternal benefit societies, health care service plans, health maintenance organizations and any other entity delivering or issuing for delivery in this state Medicare supplement policies or certificates;

“Medicare supplement policy” means a group or individual disability insurance policy or a subscriber contract of hospital and medical service associations or health maintenance organizations other than a policy issued pursuant to a contract under section 1876 of the federal Social Security Act, or an issued policy under a demonstration project specified in 42 U.S.C. 1395ss(g)(1), which is advertised, marketed or designed primarily as a supplement to reimbursements under Medicare for the hospital, medical or surgical expenses of persons eligible for Medicare;

“Medicare” means the “Health Insurance for the Aged Act,” Title XVIII of the Social Security Amendments of 1965, as then constituted or later amended;

“Policy form” means the form on which the policy is delivered or issued for delivery by the issuer;

“This act” means W.S.

26-38-201

through

26-38-209

.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 20, § 1; 1992, ch. 57, § 1; 1997, ch. 12, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Social Security Act. —

The federal Social Security Act, referred to in subsection (a)(v), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq. Section 1876 of the act, also referred to in subsection (a)(v), appears as 42 U.S.C. 1395mm. The federal Health Insurance for the Aged Act, Title XVIII of the Social Security Amendments of 1965, referred to in subsection (a)(vi), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.

§ 26-38-202.
Applicability and scope.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, this act shall apply to:

All Medicare supplement policies delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after the effective date of this act; and

All certificates issued under group Medicare supplement policies which have been delivered or issued for delivery in this state.

This act shall not apply to a policy issued to one (1) or more employers or labor organizations, or to the trustees of a fund established by one (1) or more employers or labor organizations, or combination thereof, for employees or former employees or a combination thereof, or for members or former members, or a combination thereof, of the labor organizations.

Except as provided by regulations adopted pursuant to W.S. 26-38-206(e), the provisions of this act are not intended to prohibit or apply to insurance policies or health care benefit plans, including group conversion policies, provided to Medicare eligible persons which policies are not marketed or held to be Medicare supplement policies or benefit plans.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 20, § 1; 1992, ch. 57, § 1; 1997, ch. 12, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1990, ch. 20, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 1990.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a) and in subsections (b) and (c), see § 26-38-201(a)(viii).

Meaning of “Medicare.” —

For the definition of “Medicare,” referred to in this section, see § 26-38-201(a)(vi) and notes thereto.

§ 26-38-203.
Standards for policy provisions.

No Medicare supplement insurance policy or certificate in force in the state shall contain benefits which duplicate benefits provided by Medicare.

The commissioner shall adopt reasonable regulations to establish specific standards for policy provisions of Medicare supplement policies and certificates. The standards shall be in addition to and in accordance with applicable laws of this state. No requirement of the code relating to minimum required policy benefits, other than the minimum standards contained in this act, shall apply to Medicare supplement policies and certificates. The standards may cover, but are not limited to:

Terms of renewability;

Initial and subsequent conditions of eligibility;

Nonduplication of coverage;

Probationary periods;

Benefit limitations, exceptions and reductions;

Elimination periods;

Requirements for replacement;

Recurrent conditions; and

Definitions of terms.

The commissioner shall adopt reasonable regulations that specify prohibited policy provisions not otherwise specifically authorized by statute which, in the opinion of the commissioner, are unjust, unfair or unfairly discriminatory to any person insured or proposed for coverage under a Medicare supplement policy or certificate.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or contract, a Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not exclude or limit benefits for losses incurred more than ninety (90) days from the effective date of coverage because the loss involved a preexisting condition. The policy or certificate shall not define a preexisting condition more restrictively than a condition for which medical advice was given or treatment was recommended by or received from a physician within ninety (90) days before the effective date of coverage.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 20, § 1; 1992, ch. 57, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the next-to-last sentence in the introductory paragraph of subsection (b), see § 26-38-201(a)(viii).

Meaning of “Medicare.” —

For the definition of “Medicare,” referred to in this section, see § 26-38-201(a)(vi) and notes thereto.

§ 26-38-204.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall adopt reasonable regulations to establish minimum standards for benefits, claims payment, marketing practices, compensation arrangements and reporting practices for Medicare supplement policies and certificates.

The commissioner may adopt reasonable regulations necessary to conform Medicare supplement policies and certificates to the requirements of federal law and regulations, including but not limited to:

Requiring refunds or credits if the policies or certificates do not meet loss ratio requirements;

Establishing a uniform methodology for calculating and reporting loss ratios;

Assuring public access to policies, premiums and loss ratio information of issuers of Medicare supplement insurance;

Establishing a process for approving or disapproving policy forms and certificate forms and restricting premium increases if loss ratio requirements are not met;

Establishing a policy for holding public hearings prior to approval of premium increases; and

Establishing standards for Medicare select policies and certificates.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 20, § 1; 1992, ch. 57, § 1.

Meaning of “Medicare.” —

For the definition of “Medicare,” referred to throughout this section, see § 26-38-201(a)(vi) and notes thereto.

§ 26-38-205.
Loss ratio standards.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 57, § 2.

Medicare supplement policies shall return to policyholders benefits which are reasonable in relation to the premium charged. The commissioner shall issue reasonable regulations to establish minimum standards for loss ratios of Medicare supplement policies on the basis of incurred claims experience, or incurred health care expenses where coverage is provided by a health maintenance organization on a service rather than reimbursement basis, and earned premiums in accordance with accepted actuarial principles and practices.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 20, § 1; 1992, ch. 57, §§ 1, 2.

Meaning of “Medicare.” —

For the definition of “Medicare,” referred to in both sentences in subsection (b), see § 26-38-201(a)(vi) and notes thereto.

§ 26-38-206.
Disclosure standards.

In order to provide for full and fair disclosure in the sale of Medicare supplement policies, no Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall be delivered in this state unless an outline of coverage is delivered to the applicant at the time application is made.

The commissioner shall prescribe both the format and content of the outline of coverage required by subsection (a) of this section. For purposes of this section, “format” means style, arrangements and overall appearance, including such items as the size, color and prominence of type and arrangement of text and captions. The outline of coverage shall include but is not limited to:

A description of the principal benefits and coverage provided in the policy;

A statement of the exceptions, reductions and limitations contained in the policy;

A statement of the renewal provisions, including any reservation by the insurer of a right to change premiums and disclosure of the existence of any automatic renewal premium increases based on the policyholder’s age;

A statement that the outline of coverage is a summary of the policy issued or applied for and that the policy should be consulted to determine governing contractual provisions.

The commissioner may prescribe by regulation a standard form and the contents of an informational brochure for persons eligible for Medicare, which is intended to improve the buyer’s ability to select the most appropriate coverage and improve the buyer’s understanding of Medicare. Except in the case of direct response insurance policies, the commissioner may require by regulation that the information brochure be provided to any prospective insureds eligible for Medicare concurrently with delivery of the outline of coverage. With respect to direct response insurance policies, the commissioner may require by regulation that the prescribed brochure be provided upon request to any prospective insureds eligible for Medicare, but in no event later than the time the policy is delivered.

The commissioner may adopt reasonable regulations for captions or notice requirements determined to be in the public interest and designed to inform prospective insureds that particular insurance coverages are not Medicare supplement coverages, for all disability insurance policies sold to persons eligible for Medicare, other than:

Medicare supplement policies; or

Disability income policies.

and (iv) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 12, § 2.

The commissioner may further adopt reasonable regulations to govern the full and fair disclosure of the information in connection with the replacement of disability policies, subscriber contracts or certificates by persons eligible for Medicare.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 20, § 1; 1992, ch. 57, § 1; 1997, ch. 12, §§ 1, 2.

Meaning of “Medicare.” —

For the definition of “Medicare,” referred to in this section, see § 26-38-201(a)(vi) and notes thereto.

§ 26-38-207.
Notice of free examination.

Medicare supplement policies or certificates shall have a notice prominently printed on the first page of the policy or certificate or attached thereto stating in substance that the applicant shall have the right to return the policy or certificate within thirty (30) days of its delivery and to have the full premium refunded if, after examination of the policy or certificate, the applicant is not satisfied for any reason. Any refund made pursuant to this section shall be paid directly to the applicant by the insurer in a timely manner.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 20, § 1.

§ 26-38-208.
Filing requirements for advertising.

Every issuer of Medicare supplement insurance policies or certificates in this state shall provide to the insurance commissioner a copy of any Medicare supplement advertisement intended for use in this state whether through written, radio or television medium, for review by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 20, § 1; 1992, ch. 57, § 1.

Meaning of “Medicare.” —

For the definition of “Medicare,” referred to twice in this section, see § 26-38-201(a)(vi) and notes thereto.

§ 26-38-209.
Penalties.

In addition to any other applicable penalties for violations of this code, the commissioner may:

Require insurers to cease marketing any Medicare supplement policy or certificate in this state which violates any provision of this act, any other law administered by the commissioner, any regulation promulgated pursuant to this act or any other rule promulgated pursuant to the authority of the commissioner; or

Require the insurer to take any actions necessary to comply with the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 20, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in subsection (a)(i), and in subsection (a)(ii), see § 26-38-201(a)(viii).